Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.067

Secondhand precious metal dealers—Prohibited acts—Penalty.

(1) It is a gross misdemeanor for:

(a) A secondhand precious metal dealer to knowingly make, cause, or allow to be made any false entry or misstatement of any material matter in any book, record, or writing required to be kept under RCW 19.60.025, 19.60.057, 19.60.042, 19.60.077, and 19.60.095 involving property consisting of precious metal;

(b) A secondhand precious metal dealer to receive any precious metal property from any person known to the secondhand precious metal dealer as having been convicted of burglary, robbery, theft, or possession of or receiving stolen property within the past ten years whether the person is acting in his or her own behalf or as the agent of another; or

(c) A secondhand precious metal dealer to knowingly violate any other provision relating to precious metals under RCW 19.60.025, 19.60.057, 19.60.042, 19.60.077, and 19.60.095.

(2) It is a class C felony for a secondhand precious metal dealer to commit a second or subsequent violation of subsection (1) of this section involving property consisting of a precious metal.

[ 2011 c 289 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 289: See note following RCW 19.60.010.